src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_h/alten__vblex !!= * @CODE@ halten:halt
+V:en  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_h/alten__vb_01 ;
+V000@D.PTC@:@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_h/alten__vb_01
:  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:%^Umlaut IND-PRS-SG2 ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%^Umlaut POST-V_01 ;
: IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:  IND-PRS-PL2 ;
: IND-PRS-PL3 ;

:%^A2IE IND-PRT_SEIN ;
: SUBJ-PRS ;
:%^A2IE SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2: POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:e%>t POST-V_01 ;

LEXICON V_l/assen__vblex !!= * @CODE@ lassen:l
+V:en  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_l/assen__vb_01 ;
+V000@D.PTC@:@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_l/assen__vb_01
:  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:%^Umlaut IND-PRS-SG2 ;
:%^Umlaut IND-PRS-SG3 ;
: IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:  IND-PRS-PL2 ;
: IND-PRS-PL3 ;

:%^A2IE%^CC2C IND-PRT_SEIN ;
: SUBJ-PRS ;
:%^A2IE%^CC2C SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2: POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%>t POST-V_01 ;

!!
LEXICON V_st/oßen__vblex !!= * @CODE@ stoßen:stoß
+V:en  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_st/oßen__vb_01 ;
+V000@D.PTC@:@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_st/oßen__vb_01
:  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:%^Umlaut%>e IND-PRS-SG2 ;
:%^Umlaut%>e IND-PRS-SG3 ;
: IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:%>e IND-PRS-PL2 ;
: IND-PRS-PL3 ;

:%^O2IE IND-PRT_SEIN ;
: SUBJ-PRS ;
:%^O2IE SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2: POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:e%>t POST-V_01 ;

!!
LEXICON V_bl/eiben__vblex !!= * @CODE@ bleiben:bleib
+V:%^EI2IE%>en  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_bl/eiben__vb_01 ;
+V000@D.PTC@:@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_bl/eiben__vb_01
:  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
: IND-PRS-SG2 ;
: IND-PRS-SG3 ;
: IND-PRS-PL1 ;
: IND-PRS-PL2 ;
: IND-PRS-PL3 ;

:%^EI2IE IND-PRT_SEIN ;
: SUBJ-PRS ;
:%^EI2IE SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2: POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%>t POST-V_01 ;

!!
LEXICON V_r/eißen__vblex !!= * @CODE@ reißen:reiss
+V:%^EI2Ien  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_r/eißen__vb_01 ;
+V@D.PTC@:%^CC2C@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_r/eißen__vb_01
:%^CC2C  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:%^CC2C%>e IND-PRS-SG2 ;
:%^CC2C IND-PRS-SG3 ;
:%^CC2C IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:%^CC2C IND-PRS-PL2 ;
:%^CC2C IND-PRS-PL3 ;

:%^EI2I IND-PRT_SEIN ;
:%^CC2C SUBJ-PRS ;
:%^EI2I SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2:%^CC2C POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%^CC2C%>e%>t POST-V_01 ;

!!
LEXICON V_gl/eichen__vblex !!= * @CODE@ gleichen:gleich
+V:%^EI2Ien  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_gl/eichen__vb_01 ;
+V@D.PTC@:@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_gl/eichen__vb_01
:  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:%>e IND-PRS-SG2 ;
: IND-PRS-SG3 ;
: IND-PRS-PL1 ;
: IND-PRS-PL2 ;
: IND-PRS-PL3 ;

:%^EI2I IND-PRT_SEIN ;
: SUBJ-PRS ;
:%^EI2I SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2: POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%>t POST-V_01 ;

!!
LEXICON V_schw/immen__vblex !!= * @CODE@ schwimmen:schwamm
+V:%^A2Oen  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_schw/immen__vb_01 ;
+V000@D.PTC@:%^A2I@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_schw/immen__vb_01
:%^A2I  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:%^A2I IND-PRS-SG2 ;
:%^A2I  IND-PRS-SG3 ;
:%^A2I IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:%^A2I  IND-PRS-PL2 ;
:%^A2I IND-PRS-PL3 ;

: IND-PRT_SEIN ;
:%^A2I SUBJ-PRS ;
:%^Umlaut SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2:%^A2I POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%^A2It POST-V_01 ;

!!
LEXICON V_br/ingen__vblex !!= * @CODE@ bringen:br
+V:acht  Praf ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_br/ingen__vb_01 ;
+V00@D.PTC@:ing@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_br/ingen__vb_01
:ing  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:ing IND-PRS-SG2 ;
:ing  IND-PRS-SG3 ;
:ing IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:ing  IND-PRS-PL2 ;
:ing IND-PRS-PL3 ;

:acht IND-PRT ;
:ing SUBJ-PRS ;
:acht%^Umlaut SUBJ-PRT ;
+Imprt+Sg2:ing POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:ing%>t POST-V_01 ;

!!
LEXICON V_d/ingen__vblex !!= * @CODE@ dingen:dang
+V:%>t  Praf ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_d/ingen__vb_01 ;
+V00@D.PTC@:%^A2I@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_d/ingen__vb_01
:%^A2I  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:%^A2I IND-PRS-SG2 ;
:%^A2I  IND-PRS-SG3 ;
:%^A2I IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:%^A2I  IND-PRS-PL2 ;
:%^A2I IND-PRS-PL3 ;

: IND-PRT_SEIN ;
:%^A2I SUBJ-PRS ;
:%^Umlaut SUBJ-PRT ;
:%^A2I SUBJ-PRT ;
+Imprt+Sg2:%^A2I POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%^A2I%>t POST-V_01 ;

!!
LEXICON V_f/inden__vblex !!= * @CODE@ finden:fand
+V:%^A2Uen  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_f/inden__vb_01 ;
+V000@D.PTC@:%^A2I@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_f/inden__vb_01
:%^A2I  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:%^A2I IND-PRS-SG2 ;
:%^A2I%>e  IND-PRS-SG3 ;
:%^A2I IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:%^A2I%>e  IND-PRS-PL2 ;
:%^A2I IND-PRS-PL3 ;

: IND-PRT_SEIN ;
:%^A2I SUBJ-PRS ;
:%^Umlaut SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2:%^A2I POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%^A2It POST-V_01 ;

!!
LEXICON V_s/itzen__vblex !!= * @CODE@ sitzen:s
+V:ess%>en  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_s/itzen__vb_01 ;
+V000@D.PTC@:itz@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_s/itzen__vb_01
:itz  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:itzt POST-V_01 ;
:itz  IND-PRS-SG3 ;
:itz IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:itz%>e  IND-PRS-PL2 ;
:itz IND-PRS-PL3 ;

:aß IND-PRT_SEIN ;
:itz SUBJ-PRS ;
:aß%^Umlaut SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2:itz POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:itz%>et POST-V_01 ;

!!
LEXICON V_d/enken__vblex !!= * @CODE@ denken:d
+V:acht  Praf ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_d/enken__vb_01 ;
+V00@D.PTC@:enk@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_d/enken__vb_01
:enk  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:enk IND-PRS-SG2 ;
:enk  IND-PRS-SG3 ;
:enk IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:enk  IND-PRS-PL2 ;
:enk IND-PRS-PL3 ;

:acht IND-PRT ;
:enk SUBJ-PRS ;
:acht%^Umlaut SUBJ-PRT ;
+Imprt+Sg2:enk POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:enk%>t POST-V_01 ;

!!
LEXICON V_bew/egen__vblex !!= * @CODE@ bewegen:bew
+V:egt  Praf ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_bew/egen__vb_01 ;
+V000@D.PTC@:eg@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_bew/egen__vb_01
:eg  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:eg IND-PRS-SG2 ;
:eg  IND-PRS-SG3 ;
:eg IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:eg  IND-PRS-PL2 ;
:eg IND-PRS-PL3 ;

:og IND-PRT_SEIN ;
:eg SUBJ-PRS ;
:og%^Umlaut SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2:eg POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:egt POST-V_01 ;

!!
LEXICON V_pfl/egen__vblex !!= * @CODE@ pflegen:pfl
V_bew/egen__vblex ;
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_pfl/egen__vb_01 ;
LEXICON V_pfl/egen__vb_01
:eg IND-PRT ;
:eg SUBJ-PRT ;

!!
LEXICON V_z/iehen__vblex !!= * @CODE@ ziehen:z
+V:ogen  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_z/iehen__vb_01 ;
+V000@D.PTC@:ieh@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_z/iehen__vb_01
:ieh  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:ieh IND-PRS-SG2 ;
:ieh  IND-PRS-SG3 ;
:ieh IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:ieh  IND-PRS-PL2 ;
:ieh IND-PRS-PL3 ;

:og IND-PRT_SEIN ;
:ieh SUBJ-PRS ;
:og%^Umlaut SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2:ieh POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:ieht POST-V_01 ;

!!
LEXICON V_fr/ieren__vblex !!= * @CODE@ frieren:fror
+V:en  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_fr/ieren__vb_01 ;
+V000@D.PTC@:%^O2IE@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_fr/ieren__vb_01
:%^O2IE  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:%^O2IE IND-PRS-SG2 ;
:%^O2IE  IND-PRS-SG3 ;
:%^O2IE IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:%^O2IE  IND-PRS-PL2 ;
:%^O2IE IND-PRS-PL3 ;

: IND-PRT_SEIN ;
:%^O2IE SUBJ-PRS ;
:%^Umlaut SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2:%^O2IE POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%^O2IE%>t POST-V_01 ;

LEXICON V_sch/ießen__vblex !!= * @CODE@ schießen:schoss
+V:en  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_sch/ießen__vb_01 ;
+V000@D.PTC@:%^O2IE%^CC2C@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_sch/ießen__vb_01
:%^O2IE%^CC2C  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:%^O2IE%^CC2C IND-PRS-SG2 ;
:%^O2IE%^CC2C  IND-PRS-SG3 ;
:%^O2IE%^CC2C IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:%^O2IE%^CC2C  IND-PRS-PL2 ;
:%^O2IE%^CC2C IND-PRS-PL3 ;

: IND-PRT_SEIN ;
:%^O2IE%^CC2C SUBJ-PRS ;
:%^Umlaut SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2:%^O2IE%^CC2C POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%^O2IE%^CC2C%>t POST-V_01 ;

!!
LEXICON V_f/ahren__vblex !!= * @CODE@ fahren:fahr
+V:en  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_f/ahren__vb_01 ;
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_f/ahren__vb_01
IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:%^Umlaut IND-PRS-SG2 ;
:%^Umlaut  IND-PRS-SG3 ;
IND-PRS-PL1 ;
IND-PRS-PL2 ;
IND-PRS-PL3 ;

:%^A2U IND-PRT_SEIN ;
: SUBJ-PRS ;
:%^A2Ü SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2: POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:t POST-V_01 ;

!!
LEXICON V_f/angen__vblex !!= * @CODE@ fangen:fang
+V:en  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_f/angen__vb_01 ;
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ Inf ;
