src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs_D
beginnen:begann V_schw/immen__vblex ; !i-i-a-ä-o
bewegen:bew V_bew/egen__vblex ; !e-e-o-ö-e
gebieten:gebot V_fr/ieren__vblex ;
gefrieren:gefror V_fr/ieren__vblex ; !ie-ie-o-ö-o
verlieren:verlor V_fr/ieren__vblex ;
LEXICON Verbs_D-NOge
binden:band V_f/inden__vblex ; !i-i-a-ä-u
leihen:leih V_bl/eiben__vblex ;
scheinen:schein V_bl/eiben__vblex ;
sitzen:s V_s/itzen__vblex ; !i-i-a-ä-e
steigen:steig V_bl/eiben__vblex ;
winnen:wann V_schw/immen__vblex ;
bringen:br V_br/ingen__vblex ; !i-i-a-ä-a
denken:d V_d/enken__vblex ; !e-e-a-ä-a
dingen:dang V_f/inden__vblex ; !i-i-a-ä/i-i
fahren:fahr V_f/ahren__vblex ;
fallen:fall V_l/assen__vblex ;
fangen:fang V_f/angen__vblex ;
finden:fand V_f/inden__vblex ;
fliegen:flog V_fr/ieren__vblex ;
gleichen:gleich V_gl/eichen__vblex ; ! ei-ei-i-i-i
halten:halt V_h/alten__vblex ;
klingen:klang V_f/inden__vblex ; !i-i-a-ä-u
laden:lad V_f/ahren__vblex ;
lassen:lass V_l/assen__vblex ; !a-a-ie-ie-a
lingen:lang V_f/inden__vblex ; !i-i-a-ä-u
raten:rat V_h/alten__vblex ;
reißen:reiss V_r/eißen__vblex ;
ringen:rang V_f/inden__vblex ; !i-i-a-ä-u
scheiden:scheid V_bl/eiben__vblex ;
scheinen:schein V_bl/eiben__vblex ;
schleichen:schleich V_gl/eichen__vblex ;
schließen:schloss V_sch/ießen__vblex ;
schreiben:schreib V_bl/eiben__vblex ;
schwimmen:schwamm V_schw/immen__vblex ;
singen:sang V_f/inden__vblex ; !i-i-a-ä-u
sinken:sank V_f/inden__vblex ;
sitzen:s V_s/itzen__vblex ; !i-i-a-ä-e
springen:sprang V_f/inden__vblex ;
stoßen:stoß V_st/oßen__vblex ;
streichen:streich V_gl/eichen__vblex ;
tragen:trag V_f/ahren__vblex ;
treiben:treib V_bl/eiben__vblex ;
trinken:trank V_f/inden__vblex ;
weichen:weich V_gl/eichen__vblex ;
ziehen:z V_z/iehen__vblex ;
zwingen:zwang V_f/inden__vblex ; !i-i-a-ä-u
LEXICON VERBS_01
gelingen:gelang V_f/inden__vblex ; !i-i-a-ä-u
finden:fand V_f/inden__vblex ; !i-i-a-ä-u
dingen:dang V_f/inden__vblex ; !i-i-a-ä/i-i
gleichen:gleich V_gl/eichen__vblex ; ! ei-ei-i-i-i
klingen:klang V_f/inden__vblex ; !i-i-a-ä-u
lingen:lang V_f/inden__vblex ; !i-i-a-ä-u
ringen:rang V_f/inden__vblex ; !i-i-a-ä-u
scheiden:scheid V_bl/eiben__vblex ;
scheinen:schein V_bl/eiben__vblex ;
schleichen:schleich V_gl/eichen__vblex ;
schließen:schloss V_sch/ießen__vblex ;
singen:sang V_f/inden__vblex ; !i-i-a-ä-u
sitzen:s V_s/itzen__vblex ; !i-i-a-ä-e
trinken:trank V_f/inden__vblex ;
zwingen:zwang V_f/inden__vblex ; !i-i-a-ä-u
denken:d V_d/enken__vblex ; !e-e-a-ä-a
bleiben:bleib V_bl/eiben__vblex ; ! ei-ei-ie-ie-ei
schreiben:schreib V_bl/eiben__vblex ; ! ei-ei-ie-ie-ei
beißen:beiss V_r/eißen__vblex ;
pflegen:pfl V_pfl/egen__vblex ; !e-e-o-ö-o
schlagen:schlag V_f/ahren__vblex ;
waschen:wasch V_f/ahren__vblex ; !a-ä-u-ü-a
finden:fand V_f/inden__vblex ; !i-i-a-ä-u
springen:sprang V_f/inden__vblex ; !i-i-a-ä-u
schwingen:schwang V_f/inden__vblex ; !i-i-a-ä-u
fangen:fang V_f/angen__vblex ; !a-ä-i-i-a
stoßen:stoß V_st/oßen__vblex ; !o-ö-ie-ie-o
schießen:schoss V_sch/ießen__vblex ; !ieß-ieß-oss-öss-oss
genießen:genoss V_sch/ießen__vblex ;
wiegen:wog V_fr/ieren__vblex ;
biegen:bog V_fr/ieren__vblex ;
bieten:bot V_fr/ieren__vblex ;
bringen:br V_br/ingen__vblex ; !i-i-a-ä-a
fliegen:flog V_fr/ieren__vblex ;
fliehen:floh V_fr/ieren__vblex ;
fahren:fahr V_f/ahren__vblex ; !a-ä-u-ü-a
laden:lad V_f/ahren__vblex ;
lassen:lass V_l/assen__vblex ; !a-a-ie-ie-a
fallen:fall V_l/assen__vblex ; !a-a-ie-ie-a
schieben:schob V_fr/ieren__vblex ;
schwimmen:schwamm V_schw/immen__vblex ; !i-i-a-ä-o
sinken:sank V_f/inden__vblex ;
springen:sprang V_f/inden__vblex ; !i-i-a-ä-u
tragen:trag V_f/ahren__vblex ;
treiben:treib V_bl/eiben__vblex ; ! ei-ei-ie-ie-ei
weichen:weich V_gl/eichen__vblex ;
winnen:wann V_schw/immen__vblex ;
frieren:fror V_fr/ieren__vblex ; !ie-ie-o-ö-o
ziehen:z V_z/iehen__vblex ; !ie-ie-o-ö-o
fangen:fang V_f/angen__vblex ; !a-ä-i-i-a
halten:halt V_h/alten__vblex ;
raten:rat V_h/alten__vblex ;
reißen:reiss V_r/eißen__vblex ; ! ei-ei-i-i-i
streichen:streich V_gl/eichen__vblex ;
weisen:weis V_bl/eiben__vblex ; ! ei-ei-ie-ie-ie
heißen:heiß V_bl/eiben__vblex ;
